Massachusetts, session 194th, S2496.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6A of Chapter 2 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after (g),
the following:-
"(h) On the death of an actively serving service member from the U.S. Army, U.S. Air
Force, U.S. Navy, U.S. Marine Corp, U.S. Space Force, U.S. Coast Guard, the Reserve
Component, or the National Guard from the Commonwealth."
of 1